California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 data from the department’s prescription drug paid claims tapes within 30 days of receipt of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ file of manufacturer rebate information. In lieu of paying the entire invoiced amount, a manufacturer may contest the invoiced amount pursuant to procedures established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid Drug Rebate Program Releases or regulations by mailing a notice, that shall set forth its grounds for contesting the invoiced amount, to the department within 38 days of the department’s mailing of the state invoice and supporting utilization data. For purposes of state accounting practices only, the contested balance shall not be considered an accounts receivable amount until final resolution of the dispute pursuant to procedures established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid Drug Rebate Program Releases or regulations that results in a finding of an underpayment by the manufacturer. Manufacturers
 may request, and the department shall timely provide, at cost, Medi-Cal provider level drug utilization data, and other Medi-Cal utilization data necessary to resolve a contested department-invoiced rebate amount.

(2) The department shall provide for an annual audit of utilization data used to calculate the state rebate to verify the accuracy of that data. The findings of the audit shall be documented in a written audit report to be made available to manufacturers within 90 days of receipt of the report from the auditor. Any manufacturer may receive a copy of the audit report upon written request. Contracts between the department and manufacturers shall provide for any equalization payment adjustments determined necessary pursuant to an audit.

(3) (A) Utilization data used to determine the state rebate shall exclude data from both of the following:

(i) Health maintenance organizations, as defined in Section 300e(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code, including those organizations that contract under Section 1396b(m) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(ii) Capitated plans that include a prescription drug benefit in the capitated rate, and that have negotiated contracts for rebates or discounts with manufacturers.

(B) This paragraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2014.

(4) Commencing July 1, 2014, utilization data used to determine the state rebate shall include data from all programs, including, but not limited to, fee-for-service Medi-Cal, and utilization data, as limited in paragraph (5), from health plans contracting with the department to provide services to beneficiaries pursuant to
 this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), that qualify for federal drug rebates pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8) or that otherwise qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) pursuant to the Medicaid state plan or waivers.

(5) Health plan utilization data shall be limited to those drugs for which a health plan is authorizing a prescription drug described in subparagraph (A), and pursuant to the coverage policies established in subparagraph (B):

(A) A prescription drug for which the department reimburses the health plan through a separate capitated payment or other supplemental payment. Payment shall not be withheld for decisions determined pursuant to Section 1374.34 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The department shall develop coverage policies, consistent with the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14105.39 and in consultation with clinical experts, Medi-Cal managed care plans, and other stakeholders, for prescription drugs described in subparagraph (A). These coverage policies shall apply to the entire Medi-Cal program, including fee-for-service and Medi-Cal managed care, through the Medi-Cal List of Contract Drugs or through provider bulletins, all plan letters, or similar instructions. Coverage policies developed pursuant to this section shall be revised on a semiannual basis or upon approval by the Food and Drug Administration of a new drug subject to subparagraph (A). For the purposes of this section, “coverage policies” include, but are not limited to, clinical guidelines and treatment and utilization policies.

(6) For prescription
 drugs not subject to the requirements of paragraph (5), utilization data used to determine the state rebate shall include all data from health plans, except for health maintenance organizations, as defined in Section 300e(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code, including those organizations that contract pursuant to Section 1396b(m) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(7) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (5) by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt regulations by October 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code. Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, beginning six months after the effective date of this section, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.

(c) In order that Medi-Cal beneficiaries may have access to a comprehensive range of therapeutic agents, the department shall ensure that there is representation on the list of contract drugs in all major therapeutic categories. Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 14105.35, the department shall not be required to contract with all manufacturers who negotiate for a contract in a particular category. The department shall ensure that there is sufficient representation of single-source and multiple-source drugs, as appropriate, in each major therapeutic category.

(d) The
 department shall select the therapeutic categories to be included on the list of contract drugs, and the order in which it seeks contracts for those categories. The department may establish different contracting schedules for single-source and multiple-source drugs within a given therapeutic category.

(e) (1) In order to fully implement subdivision (d), the department shall, to the extent necessary, negotiate or renegotiate contracts to ensure there are as many single-source drugs within each therapeutic category or subcategory as the department determines necessary to meet the health needs of the Medi-Cal population. The department may determine in selected therapeutic categories or subcategories that no single-source drugs are necessary because there are currently sufficient multiple-source drugs in the therapeutic category or subcategory on the list of contract drugs to meet the health needs of the Medi-Cal population.
 However, in no event shall a beneficiary be denied continued use of a drug that is part of a prescribed therapy in effect as of September 2, 1992, until the prescribed therapy is no longer prescribed.

(2) In the development of decisions by the department on the required number of single-source drugs in a therapeutic category or subcategory, and the relative therapeutic merits of each drug in a therapeutic category or subcategory, the department shall consult with the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee. The committee members shall communicate their comments and recommendations to the department within 30 business days of a request for consultation, and shall disclose any associations with pharmaceutical manufacturers or any remuneration from pharmaceutical manufacturers.

(f) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature declares that an expedited process for
 contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into on a nonbid basis shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(g) In no event shall a beneficiary be denied continued use of a drug that is part of a prescribed therapy in effect as of September 2, 1992, until the prescribed therapy is no longer prescribed.

(h) Contracts executed pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(i) The department shall provide individual notice to Medi-Cal beneficiaries at least 60 calendar days prior to the effective date of the deletion or suspension of any drug from the list of
 contract drugs. The notice shall include a description of the beneficiary’s right to a fair hearing and shall encourage the beneficiary to consult a physician to determine if an appropriate substitute medication is available from Medi-Cal.

(j) In carrying out the provisions of this section, the department may contract either directly, or through the fiscal intermediary, for pharmacy consultant staff necessary to initially accomplish the treatment authorization request reviews.

(k) (1) Manufacturers shall calculate and pay interest on late or unpaid rebates. The interest shall not apply to any prior period adjustments of unit rebate amounts or department utilization adjustments.

(2) For state rebate payments, manufacturers shall calculate and pay interest on late or unpaid rebates for quarters
 that begin on or after the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.

(3) Following final resolution of any dispute pursuant to procedures established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid Drug Rebate Program Releases or regulations regarding the amount of a rebate, any underpayment by a manufacturer shall be paid with interest calculated pursuant to subdivisions (m) and (n), and any overpayment, together with interest at the rate calculated pursuant to subdivisions (m) and (n), shall be credited by the department against future rebates due.

(l) Interest pursuant to subdivision (k) shall begin accruing 38 calendar days from the date of mailing of the invoice, including supporting utilization data sent to the manufacturer. Interest shall continue to accrue until the date of mailing of the manufacturer’s payment.

(m) Except as specified in subdivision (n), interest rates and calculations pursuant to subdivision (k) for Medicaid rebates and state rebates shall be identical and shall be determined by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Medicaid Drug Rebate Program Releases or regulations.

(n) If the date of mailing of a state rebate payment is 69 days or more from the date of mailing of the invoice, including supporting utilization data sent to the manufacturer, the interest rate and calculations pursuant to subdivision (k) shall be as specified in subdivision (m), however the interest rate shall be increased by 10 percentage points. This subdivision shall apply to payments for amounts invoiced for any quarters that begin on or after the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.

(o) If the rebate
 payment is not received, the department shall send overdue notices to the manufacturer at 38, 68, and 98 days after the date of mailing of the invoice, and supporting utilization data. If the department has not received a rebate payment, including interest, within 180 days of the date of mailing of the invoice, including supporting utilization data, the manufacturer’s contract with the department shall be deemed to be in default and the contract may be terminated in accordance with the terms of the contract. For all other manufacturers, if the department has not received a rebate payment, including interest, within 180 days of the date of mailing of the invoice, including supporting utilization data, all of the drug products of those manufacturers shall be made available only through prior authorization effective 270 days after the date of mailing of the invoice, including utilization data sent to manufacturers.

(p) If the manufacturer provides
 payment or evidence of payment to the department at least 40 days prior to the proposed date the drug is to be made available only through prior authorization pursuant to subdivision (o), the department shall terminate its actions to place the manufacturers’ drug products on prior authorization.

(q) The department shall direct the state’s fiscal intermediary to remove prior authorization requirements imposed pursuant to subdivision (o) and notify providers within 60 days after payment by the manufacturer of the rebate, including interest. If a contract was in place at the time the manufacturers’ drugs were placed on prior authorization, removal of prior authorization requirements shall be contingent upon good faith negotiations and a signed contract with the department.

(r) Beginning
 January 1, 2026, a beneficiary may obtain covered drugs placed on prior authorization pursuant to subdivision (o) only if their pharmacy provider or prescriber initiates a prior authorization request that is subsequently approved by the department.

(s) Beginning January 1, 2026, a beneficiary may continue to receive drugs previously prescribed but subject to prior authorization if their pharmacy provider or prescriber initiates a prior authorization request that is subsequently approved by the department.

(t) Drugs covered pursuant to Sections 14105.43 and 14133.2 shall not be subject to prior authorization pursuant to subdivision (o), and any other drug may be exempted from prior authorization by the department if the director determines that an essential need exists for that drug, and there are no other drugs currently available without prior authorization that meet that need.

(u) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting subdivisions (k) to (t), inclusive, that the department and manufacturers shall cooperate and make every effort to
 resolve rebate payment disputes within 90 days of notification by the manufacturer to the department of a dispute in the calculation of rebate payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 93.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.332.

State and federal rebates that are owed to the state for drugs dispensed to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall not be reduced to the state if a manufacturer reports, to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the department, a revised drug product’s average manufacturer price or best price as these terms are defined pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8) for any
 calendar quarter in which the rebate was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 96.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.334.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, the department shall seek the necessary federal approvals to establish and administer a drug rebate program to collect rebate payments from drug manufacturers with respect to drugs furnished to selected populations of California residents that are ineligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits under this chapter.

(b) The department shall administer the drug rebate program for qualified non-Medi-Cal populations consistent with the applicable requirements and procedures of the federal Medicaid Drug Rebate Program implemented pursuant to Section 14105.33 and Section 1396r-8 of Title 42 of the United States
 Code.

(c) The department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall determine the non-Medi-Cal populations to be included in the drug rebate program administered pursuant to this section based on the level to which the department can demonstrate that their inclusion furthers the goals and objectives of the Medi-Cal program, increases the efficiency and economy of the Medi-Cal program, and sufficiently benefits the Medi-Cal population as a whole.

(d) The department shall seek any federal approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, via submission of State Plan Amendments or other applicable mechanism, it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals
 are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(f) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis with manufacturers of single-source and multiple-source drugs. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title
 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(g) Any rebate payments collected from manufacturers pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund, created pursuant to Section 14105.36.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 451.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.34.

(a) The department shall provide for an annual written report of Medi-Cal pharmacy costs or Medi-Cal drug costs, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 14105.31.

(b) The annual report shall be consistent with the relevant sections of the Quarterly Report of Expenditures for the Medi-Cal Assistance Program, known as the CMS-64 Report,
 provided to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The report shall include the following expenditure and receipt information:

(1) The total annual rebate amounts received by the department pursuant to agreements with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(2) The total annual rebate amounts received pursuant to state contracts with drug manufacturers.

(3) Total drug cost amounts upon which rebate payments were made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 3, Sec. 97.   (AB 97)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.35.

(a) (1) On and after July 1, 1990, drugs included on the Medi-Cal drug formulary shall be included on the list of contract drugs until the department and the manufacturer have concluded contract negotiations or the department suspends the drug from the list of contract drugs pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision.

The department shall, in writing, invite any manufacturer with single-source drug products on the formulary as of July 1, 1990, to enter into negotiations
 relative to the retention of its drug or drugs. As to the issue of cost, the department shall accept the manufacturer’s best price as sufficient for purposes of entering into a contract to retain the drug or drugs on the list of contract drugs.

If the department and a manufacturer enter into a contract for retention of a drug or drugs on the list of contract drugs, the drug or drugs shall be retained on the list of contract drugs for the effective term of the contract.

If a manufacturer refuses to enter into negotiations with the department pursuant to this subdivision, or if after 30 days of negotiation, the manufacturer has not agreed to execute a contract for a drug at the manufacturer’s best price, the department may suspend from the list of contract drugs the manufacturer’s single-source drug in question for a period of at least 180 days. The department shall lift the suspension upon execution of a contract for that
 drug. Consistent with the provisions of this section, the department shall delete the Medi-Cal drug formulary specified in paragraphs (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 59999 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) On and after July 1, 1990, the director may retain a drug on the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs even if no contract is executed with a manufacturer, if the director determines that an essential need exists for that drug, and there are no other drugs currently on the formulary that meet that need.

(3) The director may delete a drug from the list of contract drugs if the director determines that the drug presents problems of safety or misuse. The director’s decision as to safety shall be based upon published medical literature, and the director’s decision as to misuse shall be based on published medical literature and claims data supplied by the fiscal
 intermediary.

(b) Any reference to the Medi-Cal drug formulary by statute or regulation shall be construed as referring to the list of contract drugs.

(c) (1) Any drug in the process of being added to the formulary by contract agreement pursuant to Section 14105.3, executed prior to the effective date of this section, shall be added to the list of contract drugs.

(2) Contracts pursuant to Section 14105.3 executed prior to January 1, 1991, shall be considered to be contracts executed pursuant to Section 14105.33, and the department shall exempt the drugs included in these contracts from the initial therapeutic category review in which they would normally be considered.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the
 department to discontinue negotiations into which it has entered with any manufacturer as of the effective date of this section. Contracts entered into as a result of these negotiations shall be exempt from the initial therapeutic category review in which they would normally be considered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 60.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.36.

(a) (1) The Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) Nonfederal moneys collected by the department pursuant to Sections 14105.33, 14105.332, 14105.436 and 14105.86 and Section 1396r-8 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as part of the state’s share of state and federal supplemental Medi-Cal drug rebates, shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds deposited in the Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for purposes of funding the nonfederal share of health care services for
 children, adults, seniors, and persons with disabilities enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, the Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund shall contain all interest and dividends earned on moneys in the fund and shall be used only for the purpose identified in subdivision (b).

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the funds in the Medi-Cal Drug Rebate Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 48.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.37.

(a) The department shall notify each manufacturer of drugs in therapeutic categories selected pursuant to Section 14105.33 of the provisions of Sections 14105.31 to 14105.42, inclusive.

(b) If, within 30 days of notification, a manufacturer does not enter into negotiations for a contract pursuant to those sections, the department may suspend or delete from the list of contract drugs, or refuse to consider for addition, drugs of that manufacturer in the selected therapeutic
 categories.

(c) If, after 120 days from the initial notification, a contract is not executed for a drug currently on the list of contract drugs, the department may suspend or delete the drug from the list of contract drugs.

(d) If, within 120 days from the initial notification, a contract is executed for a drug currently on the list of contract drugs, the department shall retain the drug on the list of contract drugs.

(e) If, within 120 days from the date of the initial notification, a contract is executed for a drug not currently on the list of contract drugs, the department shall add the drug to the list of contract drugs.

(f) The department shall terminate all negotiations 120 days after the initial notification.

(g) The department may suspend or delete any drug from the list of contract drugs at the expiration of the contract term or when the contract between the department and the manufacturer of that drug is terminated.

(h) In the absence of a contract, the department may suspend or delete any drug from the list of contract drugs.

(i) Any drug suspended from the list of contract drugs pursuant to this section or Section 14105.35 shall be subject to prior authorization, as if that drug were not on the list of contract drugs.

(j) Any drug suspended from the list of contract drugs pursuant to this section or Section 14105.35 may be deleted from the list of contract drugs in accordance with Section 14105.38.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 65.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.38.

When the department determines that a drug should be removed from the list of contract drugs, the department shall provide individual notice to impacted beneficiaries, at least 60 calendar days prior to the drug being removed from the list of contract drugs, that the drug is only obtainable through the prior authorization process. The notice shall include a description of the beneficiary’s right to a fair hearing and shall encourage the beneficiary to consult a physician to determine if an appropriate substitute medication is available from Medi-Cal. The department shall also provide provider notice about the removal at least 60 calendar days prior to the drug being removed from the list of contract drugs on the department’s internet website.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 95.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.39.

(a) (1) A manufacturer of a new single-source drug may request inclusion of its drug on the list of contract drugs pursuant to Section 14105.33 provided all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The request is made within 12 months of approval for marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(B) The manufacturer agrees to negotiate a contract with the department to provide
 the drug at the manufacturer’s best price.

(C) (i) The manufacturer provides the department with necessary information, as specified by the department, in the request.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), either of the following may be submitted by the manufacturer in lieu of the Summary Basis of Approval prepared by the federal Food and Drug Administration for that drug:

(I) The federal Food and Drug Administration’s approval or approvable letter for the drug and federal Food and Drug Administration’s approved labeling.

(II) The federal Food and Drug Administration’s medical officers’ and pharmacologists’ reviews and the federal Food and Drug Administration’s approved labeling.

(D) The department had concluded contracting for the therapeutic category in which the drug is included prior to approval of the drug by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(2) Within 90 days from receipt of the request, the department shall evaluate the request using the criteria identified in subdivision (d), and shall submit the drug to the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee.

(b) Any petition for the addition to or deletion of a drug to the Medi-Cal drug formulary submitted prior to July 31, 1990, shall be deemed to be denied. A manufacturer who has submitted a petition deemed denied may request inclusion of that drug on the list of contract drugs provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The manufacturer agrees to negotiate for a
 contract with the department to provide the drug at the manufacturer’s best price.

(2) The manufacturer provides the department with necessary information, as specified by the department, in the request.

(3) The manufacturer submits the request to the department prior to October 1, 1990.

(c) (1) To ensure that the health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met consistent with the intent of this chapter, the department shall, when evaluating a decision to execute a contract, and when evaluating drugs for retention on, addition to, or deletion from, the list of contract drugs, use all of the following criteria:

(A) The safety of the drug.

(B) The effectiveness of the
 drug.

(C) The essential need for the drug.

(D) The potential for misuse of the drug.

(E) The cost of the drug.

(2) The deficiency of a drug when measured by one of these criteria may be sufficient to support a decision that the drug should not be added or retained, or should be deleted from the list. However, the superiority of a drug under one criterion may be sufficient to warrant the addition or retention of the drug, notwithstanding a deficiency in another criterion.

(d) (1) A manufacturer of single-source drugs denied a contract pursuant to this section or Section 14105.33 or 14105.37, may file an appeal of that decision with the director within 30 calendar days
 of the department’s written decision.

(2) Within 30 calendar days of the manufacturer’s appeal, the director shall request a recommendation regarding the appeal from the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee. The committee shall provide its recommendation in writing, within 30 calendar days of the director’s request.

(3) The director shall issue a final decision on the appeal within 30 calendar days of the recommendation.

(e) Deletions made to the list of contract drugs, including those made pursuant to Section 14105.37, shall become effective no sooner than 30 days after publication of the changes in provider bulletins.

(f) A manufacturer of a drug deleted from, or not added to, the list of contract drugs may request inclusion of the drug on the
 list of preferred prior authorization drugs that is hereby established as a subset of the list of contract drugs. To ensure that the health needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries are met, the department shall evaluate the request pursuant to subdivision (c). The department shall give preference for prior authorization drugs based on the medical need or continuing care of the beneficiary. The department may contract with manufacturers of drugs on the list of preferred prior authorization drugs. Contracts executed pursuant to this subdivision are subject to Section 14105.33.

(g) Changes made to the list of contract drugs under this or any other section are exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and
 approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 63.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.395.

(a) The department may implement utilization controls through the establishment of guidelines, protocols, algorithms, or criteria for drugs, medical supplies, durable medical equipment, and enteral formulae. The department shall publish the guidelines, protocols, algorithms, or criteria in the pharmacy and medical provider manuals.

(b) The department shall issue providers written notice of changes pursuant to subdivision (a) at least 30 days prior to implementation.

(c) Changes made pursuant to this section are exempt from the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing this section with respect to all of the following:

(1) Notifying the provider representatives of the proposed change.

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting to discuss the change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the change.

(4) Providing advance notice on the implementation and effective date of the change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 66.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.4.

(a) The director shall appoint a Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee for the purpose of providing scientific and medical analysis on drugs contained on the list of contract drugs. The duties of the committee shall be as follows:

(1) To review drugs in the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs and make written recommendations to the director as to the addition of any drug or the deletion of any drug from the list. These recommendations shall be in accordance with subdivision
 (c) of Section 14105.39.

(2) To review and report in writing to the director as to the comparative therapeutic effect of drugs in accordance with Section 14053.5.

(3) To prepare a fair, impartial, and independent recommendation in writing, regarding appeals from manufacturers made pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14105.39.

(b) The committee shall consist of at least one representative from each of the following groups:

(1) Physicians.

(2) Pharmacists.

(3) Schools of pharmacy or pharmacologists.

(4) Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(c) Members of the committee shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of official committee duties.

(d) In order to provide sufficient scientific information and analysis in the therapeutic categories under review, the director may replace a representative if required for specific expertise.

(e) The director shall notify the committee of the decisions made on the recommendations.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 77) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 65.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.405.

(a) A Medi-Cal beneficiary, within 90 days of receipt of the director’s notice to beneficiaries pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 14105.33, informing them of the decision to delete or suspend a drug from the list of contract drugs, may request a fair hearing pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2.

(b) Any beneficiary filing a fair hearing request regarding the deletion or suspension of a drug from the list of contract drugs shall be granted a
 treatment authorization request for that drug until a final decision is adopted by the director. Should the beneficiary seek judicial review of the director’s decision, a treatment authorization request shall be granted for that drug until a final decision is issued by the court.

(c) (1) Any Medi-Cal beneficiary, within one year of the director’s decision pursuant to Section 10959, may file a petition with the superior court, under the provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, praying for a review of both the legal and factual basis for the director’s decision.

(2) The director shall be the sole respondent in these proceedings.

(d) Any Medi-Cal beneficiary injured as a result of being denied a drug which is determined to be medically necessary may sue for injunctive or
 declaratory relief to review the director’s decision to delete or suspend a drug from the list of contract drugs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 66.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.406.

The director shall, in considering suspension or deletion of drugs from the list of contract drugs, ensure that the department has the ability to process drug treatment authorization requests (TARs) without substantial degradation of the level of service, including response time, to providers which was in effect July 1, 1990.

In considering suspension or deletion of drugs, the director shall seek the advice of the Chief of the Field Services Branch and the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee.

If the treatment authorization request
 reports provided in subdivision (b) of Section 14105.42 indicate a substantial degradation in the level of service, including response time, for processing TARs, the director shall, within 60 days, hold a public hearing on the functioning of the TAR system.

Subsequent to the hearing, the director shall consult with at least two members of each group represented on the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 14105.4 and take appropriate action to remedy the problem areas discussed in the report and in the public hearing.

Based upon the information gathered as a result of the reports and public hearing referred to above, and in consultation with the Medi-Cal Contract Drug Advisory Committee, the director may add drugs which previously had been suspended or deleted to the list of contract drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 457, Sec. 13.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.41.

Moneys accruing to the department from contracts executed pursuant to Section 14105.33 shall be deposited in the Health Care Deposit Fund, and shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 80) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 68.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.42.

(a) The department shall report to the Legislature after the first three major therapeutic categories have been reviewed and contracts executed. The report shall include the estimated savings, number of manufacturers entering negotiations, number of contracts executed, number of drugs added and deleted, and impact on Medi-Cal beneficiaries and providers.

(b) The department shall report to the Legislature, through the annual budget process, on the
 cost-effectiveness of contracts executed pursuant to Section 14105.33.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 69.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.425.

The provisions of Sections 14105.4 to 14105.41, inclusive, and Section 14105.65 shall not preclude the department from taking emergency regulatory action as it deems appropriate.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14105.42 (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 723) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 83.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.43.
